North Carolina, session 2025, HB408.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources, Office of Archives and History, the sum of eight hundred
sixty-nine thousand dollars ($869,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
complete phase one and phase two of the capital improvements at the Fort Fisher State Historic
Site.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H408-v-1*